Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 9 Review of Courts-Martial

38-2-1059.
Effect of error of law on appeal; material prejudice; lesser included offense.

A finding or sentence of a court-martial shall not be held incorrect on the ground of an error of law unless the error materially prejudices the substantial rights of the accused.

Any reviewing authority with the power to approve or affirm a finding of guilty may approve or affirm, instead, so much of the finding as includes a lesser included offense.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1059

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 859

.

38-2-1060.
Report of findings and sentence; submission of matters for consideration to convening authority; record of trial; modification of findings and sentence; recommendation of staff judge advocate; proceeding in revision; rehearing.

The findings and sentence of a court-martial shall be reported promptly to the convening authority after the announcement of the sentence.

The accused may submit to the convening authority matters for consideration by the convening authority with respect to the findings and the sentence. Any such submission shall be in writing. Except in a summary court-martial case, such a submission shall be made within 30 days after the accused has been given an authenticated record of the trial and, if applicable, the recommendation of the staff judge advocate of the service of the accused under subsection (d) of this Code section. In a summary court-martial case, such a submission shall be made within 30 days after the sentence is announced.

If the accused shows that additional time is required for the accused to submit such matters as provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the convening authority or other person taking action under this Code section, for good cause, may extend the applicable period under paragraph (1) of this subsection for not more than an additional 60 days.

In a summary court-martial case, the accused shall be promptly provided a copy of the record of trial for use in preparing the submission as provided for by paragraph (1) of this subsection.

The accused may waive the right to make a submission to the convening authority as provided for by paragraph (1) of this subsection. Such a waiver shall be made in writing and may not be revoked. For the purposes of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section, the time within which the accused may make a submission under this subsection shall be deemed to have expired upon the submission of such a waiver to the convening authority.

The authority under this Code section to modify the findings and sentence of a court-martial is a matter of command prerogative involving the sole discretion of the convening authority. If it is impractical for the convening authority to act, the convening authority shall forward the case to a person exercising general court-martial jurisdiction who may take action under this Code section.

Action on the sentence of a court-martial shall be taken by the convening authority or by another person authorized to act under this Code section. Such action may be taken only after consideration of any matters submitted by the accused under subsection (b) of this Code section or after the time for submitting such matters expires, whichever is earlier. The convening authority or other person taking such action, in that person’s sole discretion, may approve, disapprove, commute, or suspend the sentence in whole or in part.

Action on the findings of a court-martial by the convening authority or other person acting on the sentence shall not be required; provided, however, that such person, in the person’s sole discretion may:

Dismiss any charge or specification by setting aside a finding of guilty thereto; or

Change a finding of guilty to a charge or specification to a finding of guilty to an offense that is a lesser included offense of the offense stated in the charge or specification.

Before acting under this Code section on any general or special court-martial case in which there is a finding of guilt, the convening authority or other person taking action under this Code section shall obtain and consider the written recommendation of the staff judge advocate of the service of the accused. The convening authority or other person taking action under this Code section shall refer the record of trial to the staff judge advocate, and the staff judge advocate shall use such record in the preparation of the recommendation. The recommendation of the staff judge advocate shall include such matters as may be prescribed by regulations issued pursuant to Part 1 of Article 2 of this chapter and shall be served on the accused, who may submit any matter as provided for by subsection (b) of this Code section. Failure to object in the response to the recommendation or to any matter attached to the recommendation shall waive the right to object thereto.

The convening authority or other person taking action under this Code section, in the person’s sole discretion, may order a proceeding in revision or a rehearing.

A proceeding in revision as provided for by paragraph (1) of this subsection may be ordered if there is an apparent error or omission in the record or if the record shows improper or inconsistent action by a court-martial with respect to the findings or sentence that can be rectified without material prejudice to the substantial rights of the accused. In no case, however, may a proceeding in revision:

Reconsider a finding of not guilty of any specification or a ruling which amounts to a finding of not guilty;

Reconsider a finding of not guilty of any charge, unless there has been a finding of guilty under a specification laid under that charge, which sufficiently alleges a violation of this article; or

Increase the severity of the sentence unless the sentence prescribed for the offense is mandatory.

A rehearing may be ordered by the convening authority or other person taking action under this Code section if that person disapproves the findings and sentence and states the reasons for disapproval of the findings. If such person disapproves of the findings and sentence and does not order a rehearing, that person shall dismiss the charges. A rehearing as to the findings shall not be ordered where there is a lack of sufficient evidence in the record to support such findings. A rehearing as to the sentence shall be ordered if the convening authority or other person taking action under this subsection disapproves the sentence.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1060

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see 10 U.S.C. §§ 860-863.

38-2-1061.
Withdrawal of appeal.

In each case subject to appellate review under this article, the accused may file with the convening authority a statement expressly withdrawing the right of the accused to such appeal. Such a withdrawal shall be signed by both the accused and his or her defense counsel and shall be filed in accordance with appellate procedures as provided by law.

The accused may withdraw an appeal at any time in accordance with appellate procedures as provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1061

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1062.
State may appeal certain rulings.

In a trial by court-martial in which a punitive discharge may be adjudged, the state may appeal the following, other than a finding of not guilty with respect to the charge or specification by the members of the court-martial or by a judge in a bench trial so long as it is not made in reconsideration:

An order or ruling of the military judge which terminates the proceedings with respect to a charge or specification;

An order or ruling which excludes evidence that is substantial proof of a fact material in the proceeding;

An order or ruling which directs the disclosure of classified information;

An order or ruling which imposes sanctions for nondisclosure of classified information;

A refusal of the military judge to issue a protective order sought by the state to prevent the disclosure of classified information; and

A refusal by the military judge to enforce an order described in subparagraph (E) of this paragraph that has previously been issued by appropriate authority.

An appeal of an order or ruling may not be taken unless the trial counsel provides the military judge with written notice of appeal from the order or ruling within 72 hours of the order or ruling. Such notice shall include a certification by the trial counsel that the appeal is not taken for the purpose of delay and, if the order or ruling appealed is one which excludes evidence, that the evidence excluded is substantial proof of a fact material in the proceeding.

An appeal under this Code section shall be diligently prosecuted as provided by law.

An appeal under this Code section shall be forwarded to the court prescribed in Code Section 38-2-1067. In ruling on an appeal under this Code section, such court may act only with respect to matters of law.

Any period of delay resulting from an appeal under this Code section shall be excluded in deciding any issue regarding denial of a speedy trial unless an appropriate authority determines that the appeal was filed solely for the purpose of delay with the knowledge that it was totally frivolous and without merit.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1062

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1063.
Rehearings; grounds; members of court; effect on sentence.

Each rehearing under this article shall take place before a court-martial composed of members who were not members of the court-martial which first heard the case. Upon a rehearing, the accused may not be tried for any offense of which the accused was found not guilty by the first court-martial, and no sentence in excess of or more severe than the original sentence may be approved, unless the sentence is based upon a finding of guilty of an offense not considered upon the merits in the original proceedings or unless the sentence prescribed for the offense is mandatory. If the sentence approved after the first court-martial was in accordance with a pretrial agreement and the accused at the rehearing changes a plea with respect to the charges or specifications upon which the pretrial agreement was based, or otherwise does not comply with the pretrial agreement, the approved sentence as to those charges or specifications may include any punishment not in excess of that lawfully adjudged at the first court-martial.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1063

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1064.
Guilty findings reviewed by state judge advocate.

Each general and special court-martial case in which there has been a finding of guilty shall be reviewed by the state judge advocate or his or her designee who shall be a judge advocate. The state judge advocate shall not review a case under this subsection if that person has acted in the same case as an accuser, investigating officer, member of the court, military judge, or counsel, or has otherwise acted on behalf of the prosecution or defense; the state judge advocate shall assign review of such case to a designee who shall not have acted in the same case as an accuser, investigating officer, member of the court, military judge, or counsel, or has otherwise acted on behalf of the prosecution or defense. Such review of the state judge advocate or his or her designee shall be in writing and shall contain the following:

Conclusions as to whether:

The court had jurisdiction over the accused and the offense;

The charge and specification stated an offense; and

The sentence was within the limits prescribed as a matter of law;

A response to each allegation of error made in writing by the accused; and

If the case is sent for action under subsection (b) of this Code section, a recommendation as to the appropriate action to be taken and an opinion as to whether corrective action is required as a matter of law.

The record of trial and related documents in each case reviewed under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be sent for action to the adjutant general, if:

The judge advocate who reviewed the case recommends corrective action;

The sentence approved under Code Section 38-2-1060 extends to dismissal, a bad conduct or dishonorable discharge, or confinement for more than six months; or

Such action is otherwise required by regulations pursuant to Part 1 of Article 2 of this chapter.

If a record of trial is sent to the adjutant general under subsection (b) of this Code section, the adjutant general may:

Disapprove or approve the findings or sentence, in whole or in part;

Remit, commute, or suspend the sentence in whole or in part;

Except where the evidence was insufficient at the trial to support the findings, order a rehearing on the findings or on the sentence, or both; or

Dismiss the charges.

If a rehearing is ordered by the adjutant general but the convening authority finds a rehearing impracticable, the convening authority shall dismiss the charges.

If the opinion of the state judge advocate, or designee, in the state judge advocate’s, or designee’s, review under subsection (a) of this Code section is that corrective action is required as a matter of law and if the adjutant general does not take action that is at least as favorable to the accused as that recommended by the state judge advocate, the record of trial and action thereon shall be sent to the Governor for review and action as deemed appropriate.

The state judge advocate, or his or her designee who shall be a judge advocate, may review any case in which there has been a finding of not guilty of all charges and specifications. If the state judge advocate has acted in the same case as an accuser, investigating officer, member of the court, military judge, or counsel or has otherwise acted on behalf of the prosecution or defense, the state judge advocate may assign such case to a designee who has not acted in the same case as an accuser, investigating officer, member of the court, military judge, or counsel or has otherwise acted on behalf of the prosecution or defense and who shall determine whether a review shall be conducted under this subsection. Such review of the state judge advocate or of his or her designee shall be limited to questions of subject matter jurisdiction.

The record of trial and related documents in each case reviewed under subsection (d) of this Code section shall be sent for action to the adjutant general; the adjutant general may:

When subject matter jurisdiction is found to be lacking, void the court-martial ab initio, with or without prejudice to the state, as the adjutant general deems appropriate; or

Return the record of trial and related documents to the state judge advocate or his or her designee for appeal by the state as provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1064

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 864

.

38-2-1065.
Disposition of trial records.

Except as otherwise required by this article, all records of trial and related documents shall be transmitted and disposed of as prescribed by regulations issued pursuant to Part 1 of Article 2 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1065

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1066.
Reserved.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1066

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1067.
Court-martial review panel; members; rules and regulations.

There shall be the court-martial review panel which shall hear appeals of decisions of a court-martial.

The Governor shall appoint five persons to serve as judges on the court-martial review panel. Four such judges shall be retired commissioned officers of the organized militia or state military force of another state or of the armed forces of the United States or a reserve component thereof and a member in good standing of the State Bar of Georgia. One such judge shall be a member in good standing of the State Bar of Georgia and shall not be a member, former member, or retired member of the organized militia or state military force of another state or of the armed forces of the United States or a reserve component thereof.

The Governor shall prescribe by regulations issued pursuant to Part 1 of Article 2 of this chapter the convening and administration of the court-martial review panel and the compensation provided to the judges of such panel.

An appeal to the court-martial review panel shall only be made after action on the sentence of a court-martial by the convening authority or by another person authorized to take such action as provided for in Code Section 38-2-1060 or after a decision of the convening authority to deny a petition for a new trial as provided for by Code Section 38-2-1073 or pursuant to Code Section 38-2-1062. Such appeals shall be made within 30 days after such action or decision.

The court-martial review panel shall dispose of each appeal within 90 days of such appeal made thereto. The court-martial review panel shall deliver its decision to the state judge advocate and, within three days, the state judge advocate shall serve a copy of such decision to the accused by statutory overnight delivery. The decision of the court-martial review panel shall be final for purposes of an appeal to the appellate courts of this state on the date that the state judge advocate mails the decision to the accused.

Any party to a proceeding before the court-martial review panel may secure a review of the final decision of the court-martial review panel by appeal in the manner and form provided by law for appeals from the superior courts to the appellate courts of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1067

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1068 and 38-2-1069.
Reserved.

History.

Code 1981, §§

38-2-1068

and 38-2-1069, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1070.
Appellate government counsel.

The state judge advocate shall detail a judge advocate as appellate government counsel to represent the state in the review or appeal of cases provided for in Code Section 38-2-1067 and before any federal court when requested to do so by the attorney general. Appellate government counsel shall be a member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of this state.

Upon an appeal by the state, the accused shall have the right to be represented by detailed military counsel before any reviewing authority and before any appellate court.

Upon an appeal by an accused, the accused shall have the right to be represented by military counsel before any reviewing authority.

Upon the request of an accused entitled to be so represented, the senior force judge advocate shall appoint a judge advocate to represent the accused in the review or appeal of cases specified in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section.

An accused may be represented by civilian appellate counsel at no expense to the state.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1070

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1071.
Execution of sentence extending to dismissal or dishonorable or bad conduct discharge.

If the sentence of the court-martial extends to dismissal or a dishonorable or bad conduct discharge and if the right of the accused to appellate review is not waived and an appeal is not withdrawn under Code Section 38-2-1061, that part of the sentence extending to dismissal or a dishonorable or bad conduct discharge shall not be executed until there is a final judgment as to the legality of the proceedings. A judgment as to the legality of the proceedings shall be final in such cases when review is completed by an appellate court as provided for in Code Section 38-2-1067 and is deemed final by the law of this state.

If the sentence of the court-martial extends to dismissal or a dishonorable or bad conduct discharge and if the right of the accused to appellate review is waived or an appeal is withdrawn under Code Section 38-2-1061, that part of the sentence extending to dismissal or a dishonorable or bad conduct discharge shall not be executed until review of the case by the state judge advocate and any action on that review under Code Section 38-2-1064 is completed. Any other part of a court-martial sentence may be ordered executed by the convening authority or other person acting on the case under Code Section 38-2-1060 when so approved under that Code section.

The convening authority may suspend the execution of any sentence or part thereof.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1071

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 871

.

38-2-1072.
Vacation of suspension of sentence; hearing; legal representation by military counsel; record of hearing.

Before the vacation of the suspension of a special court-martial sentence, which as approved includes a bad conduct discharge, or of any general court-martial sentence, the officer having special court-martial jurisdiction over the probationer shall hold a hearing on an alleged violation of probation. The probationer shall be represented at the hearing by military counsel if the probationer so desires.

The record of the hearing and the recommendation of the officer having special court-martial jurisdiction shall be sent for action to the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the probationer. If the officer vacates the suspension, any unexecuted part of the sentence, except a dismissal, shall be executed subject to applicable restrictions in this article.

The suspension of any other sentence may be vacated by any authority competent to convene for the command in which the accused is serving or assigned a court of the kind that imposed the sentence.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1072

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 872

.

38-2-1073.
Petition for new trial; time period; grounds.

At any time within five years after approval by the convening authority of a court-martial sentence, the accused may petition the convening authority for a new trial. Some good reason, including but not limited to newly discovered evidence or fraud on the court-martial, must be shown as to why the petition should be granted.

The decision of the convening authority provided for under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appealable as provided for under Code Section 38-2-1067.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1073

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 873

.

38-2-1074.
Remission or suspension of sentence; modification of type of discharge by Governor.

Any authority competent to convene, for the command in which the accused is serving or assigned, a court of the kind that imposed the sentence may remit or suspend any part or amount of the unexecuted part of any sentence, including, but not limited to, all uncollected forfeitures, other than a sentence approved by the Governor.

The Governor may, for good cause, substitute an administrative form of discharge for a discharge or dismissal executed in accordance with the sentence of a court-martial.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1074

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 874

.

38-2-1075.
Restoration of rights, privileges, and property, in event of remission; administrative discharge; reinstatement.

Under such regulations as may be prescribed pursuant to this chapter, all rights, privileges, and property affected by an executed part of a court-martial sentence which has been set aside or disapproved, except an executed dismissal or discharge, shall be restored unless a new trial or rehearing is ordered and such executed part is included in a sentence imposed upon the new trial or rehearing.

If a previously executed sentence of dishonorable or bad conduct discharge is not imposed on a new trial, the Governor may substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issuance unless the accused is to serve out the remainder of the accused’s enlistment.

If a previously executed sentence of dismissal is not imposed on a new trial, the Governor may substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issue, and the commissioned officer dismissed by that sentence may be reappointed by the Governor to such commissioned grade and with such rank as in the opinion of the Governor that former officer would have attained had the former officer not been dismissed. The reappointment of such a former officer shall be without regard to the existence of a vacancy and shall affect the promotion status of other officers only insofar as the Governor may direct. All time between the dismissal and the reappointment shall be considered as actual service for all purposes, including, but not limited to, the right to pay and allowances.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1075

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 875

.

38-2-1076.
Finality of proceedings, findings, and sentences; binding effect.

The appellate review of records of trial provided by this article, the proceedings, findings, and sentences of courts-martial as approved, reviewed, or affirmed as required by this article, and all dismissals and discharges carried into execution under sentences by courts-martial following approval, review, or affirmation as required by this article shall be final and conclusive. Orders publishing the proceedings of courts-martial and all action taken pursuant to those proceedings shall be binding upon all departments, courts, agencies, and officers of the United States and officers of another state subject only to action upon a petition for a new trial as provided in Code Section 38-2-1073 and to action under Code Section 38-2-1074.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1076

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 876

.

38-2-1076.1.
Court-martial sentence requires taking leave.

Under regulations prescribed pursuant to Part 1 of Article 2 of this chapter, an accused who has been sentenced by a court-martial shall be required to take leave pending completion of action under this Code section if the sentence as approved under Code Section 38-2-1060 includes an unsuspended dismissal or an unsuspended dishonorable or bad conduct discharge. The accused shall be required to begin such leave on the date on which the sentence is approved under Code Section 38-2-1060 or at any time after such date, and such leave shall be continued until the date on which action under this Code section is completed or may be terminated at any earlier time.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1076.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.